Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1623.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 40 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a chapter to read:CHAPTER 52NOTIFICATION REQUIREMENTS FOROLDER ADULT HEALTH INSURANCE POLICIESSec.5201. Definitions.5202. Power of attorney notification.§ 5201. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Agent." A person designated by a principal, who is an older 12345678910111213141516171819 adult, in a power of attorney to act on behalf of the principal."Health insurance policy." As defined in section 4001 (relating to definitions)."Older adult." An individual who is 60 years of age or older and who is a resident of this Commonwealth upon enrollment in a health insurance policy.§ 5202. Power of attorney notification.(a) Duties of insurer.--An insurer shall:(1) If an older adult is enrolling in a health insurance policy, ask the older adult if the older adult has a power of attorney which provides for health care decision making and request that the older adult provide the name and contact information of the agent under the power of attorney.(2) Inform the older adult that the purpose of collecting the information under paragraph (1) is to provide the agent with notification of the older adult enrolling in or canceling a health insurance policy.(3) If the insurer has an agent on file for an older adult, notify the agent in writing if the older adult enrolls in or cancels a health insurance policy and send a copy of the notification to the older adult. The notification shall inform the older adult of the rescission period under subsection (b) and the effect of invoking the right of rescission.(b) Rescission period.-- If an agent is notified as provided under subsection (a), the older adult has the right, within 30 days, to rescind enrollment in or cancellation of the health insurance policy without penalty.(c) Revocation of power of attorney.--If an older adult revokes a power of attorney and notifies the insurer of the 20250HB1623PN1957 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 revocation, the duties of the insurer under subsection (a) shall not apply.(d) Defense.--Good faith reliance on the information provided by an older adult shall be a complete defense to any civil or criminal action brought against an insurer based on actions taken by the insurer under this section.Section 2. The addition of 40 Pa.C.S. Ch. 52 shall apply to enrollments and cancellations of health insurance policies by older adults that occur after the effective date of this section.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1623PN1957 - 3 - 1234567891011